Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,262
Codes and practice; where filed.

Certified copies of the codes and practice adopted by reference pursuant to sections 81-2,257.01 to 81-2,259, shall be filed in the offices of the Secretary of State, Clerk of the Legislature, and department.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.20;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 31;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 19;

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 9.